California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 the In-Home Supportive Services program. Notwithstanding any other law, the county shall provide the department with a copy of the state-level criminal offender record information search response as provided to the county by the Department of Justice for any individual who has requested an appeal based upon a denial of eligibility to provide supportive services to any recipient of the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Sections 12305.81 and 12305.87. The state-level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(d) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the Department of Justice from assessing a fee pursuant to Section 11105 or 11123 of the Penal Code to cover the cost of furnishing summary criminal history information.

(e) A county authorized to secure
 a criminal background check clearance pursuant to this section shall accept a clearance for an individual described in subdivision (a) or (b) who has been deemed eligible by another nonprofit consortium, public authority, or county with criminal background check authority pursuant to either Section 12301.6 or this section, to receive payment for providing services pursuant to this article. Existence of a clearance shall be determined by verification through the case management, information, and payrolling system, that another county, nonprofit consortium, or public authority with criminal background check authority pursuant to Section 12301.6 or this section has deemed the current or prospective provider to be eligible to receive payment for providing services pursuant to this article.

(f) The department shall seek federal financial participation, to the extent possible, to cover any costs associated with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 649, Sec. 5.   (SB 930)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.87.

(a) (1) Commencing 90 days following the effective date of the act that adds this section, a person specified in paragraph (2) shall be subject to the criminal conviction exclusions provided for in this section, in addition to the exclusions required under Section 12305.81.

(2) This section shall apply to a person who
 satisfies either of the following conditions:

(A) He or she is a new applicant to provide services under this article.

(B) He or she is an applicant to provide services under this article whose application has been denied on the basis of a conviction and for whom an appeal of that denial is pending.

(b) Subject to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), an applicant subject to this section shall not be eligible to provide or receive payment for providing supportive services for 10 years following a conviction for, or incarceration following a conviction for, any of the following:

(1) A violent or serious felony, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(2) A felony offense for which a person is required to register under subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code. For purposes of this paragraph, the 10-year time period specified in this section shall commence with the date of conviction for, or incarceration following a conviction for, the underlying offense, and not the date of registration.

(3) A felony offense described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 10980.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), an application shall not be denied under this section if the applicant has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code or if the information or accusation against him or her has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal
 Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a recipient of services under this article who wishes to employ a provider applicant who has been convicted of an offense specified in subdivision (b) may submit to the county an individual waiver of the exclusion provided for in this section. This paragraph shall not be construed to allow a recipient to submit an individual waiver with respect to a conviction or convictions for offenses specified in Section 12305.81.

(2) The county shall notify a recipient who wishes to hire a person who is applying to be a provider and who has been convicted of an offense subject to exclusion under this section of that applicant’s relevant criminal offense convictions that are covered by subdivision (b). The notice shall include both of the following:

(A) A
 summary explanation of the exclusions created by subdivision (b), as well as the applicable waiver process described in this subdivision and the process for an applicant to seek a general exception, as described in subdivision (e). This summary explanation shall be developed by the department for use by all counties.

(B) An individual waiver form, which shall also be developed by the department and used by all counties. The waiver form shall include both of the following:

(i) A space for the county to include a reference to any Penal Code sections and corresponding offense names or descriptions that describe the relevant conviction or convictions that are covered by subdivision (b) and that the provider applicant has in his or her background.

(ii) A statement that the service recipient, or his or her authorized
 representative, if applicable, is aware of the applicant’s conviction or convictions and agrees to waive application of this section and employ the applicant as a provider of services under this article.

(3) To ensure that the initial summary explanation referenced in this subdivision is comprehensible for recipients and provider applicants, the department shall consult with representatives of county welfare departments and advocates for, or representatives of, recipients and providers in developing the summary explanation and offense descriptions.

(4) The individual waiver form shall be signed by the recipient, or by the recipient’s authorized representative, if applicable, and returned to the county welfare department by mail or in person. Except for a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of a minor recipient, a conservator of an adult recipient, or a spouse or
 registered domestic partner of a recipient, a provider applicant shall not sign his or her own individual waiver form as the recipient’s authorized representative. The county shall retain the waiver form and a copy of the provider applicant’s criminal offense record information search response until the date that the convictions that are the subject of the waiver request are no longer within the 10-year period specified in subdivision (b).

(5) An individual waiver submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall entitle a recipient to hire a provider applicant who otherwise meets all applicable enrollment requirements for the In-Home Supportive Services program. A provider hired pursuant to an individual waiver may be employed only by the recipient who requested that waiver, and the waiver shall only be valid with respect to convictions that are specified in that waiver. A new waiver shall be required if the provider is subsequently convicted of an
 offense to which this section otherwise would apply. A provider who wishes to be listed on a provider registry or to provide supportive services to a recipient who has not requested an individual waiver shall be required to apply for a general exception, as provided for in subdivision (e).

(6) Nothing in this section shall preclude a provider who is eligible to receive payment for services provided pursuant to an individual waiver under this subdivision from being eligible to receive payment for services provided to one or more additional recipients who obtain waivers pursuant to this same subdivision.

(7) The state and a county shall be immune from any liability resulting from granting an individual waiver under this subdivision.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), an applicant who has
 been convicted of an offense identified in subdivision (b) may seek from the department a general exception to the exclusion provided for in this section.

(2) Upon receipt of a general exception request, the department shall request a copy of the applicant’s criminal offender record information search response from the applicable county welfare department, public authority, or nonprofit consortium. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium shall provide a copy of the criminal offender record information search response, as provided to the county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium by the Department of Justice, to the department. The county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium shall provide this information in a manner that protects the confidentiality and privacy of the criminal offender record information search response. The state or federal criminal history record
 information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(3) The department shall consider the following factors when determining whether to grant a general exception under this subdivision:

(A) The nature and seriousness of the conduct or crime under consideration and its relationship to employment duties and responsibilities.

(B) The person’s activities since conviction, including, but not limited to, employment or participation in therapy education, or community service, that would indicate changed behavior.

(C) The number of convictions and the time that has elapsed since the conviction or convictions.

(D) The
 extent to which the person has complied with any terms of parole, probation, restitution, or any other sanction lawfully imposed against the person.

(E) Any evidence of rehabilitation, including character references, submitted by the person, or by others on the person’s behalf.

(F) Employment history and current or former employer recommendations. Additional consideration shall be given to employer recommendations provided by a person who has received or has indicated a desire to receive supportive or personal care services from the applicant, including, but not limited to, those services, specified in Section 12300.

(G) Circumstances surrounding the commission of the offense that would demonstrate the unlikelihood of repetition.

(H) The granting by the
 Governor of a full and unconditional pardon.

(f) If the department makes a determination to deny an application to provide services pursuant to a request for a general exception, the department shall notify the applicant of this determination by either personal service or registered mail. The notice shall include the following information:

(1) A statement of the department’s reasons for the denial that evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any, and that specifically addresses any evidence submitted relating to the factors in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(2) A copy of the applicant’s criminal offender record information search response, even if the applicant already has received a copy pursuant to Section 12301.6 or 12305.86. The department shall provide this information in a manner
 that protects the confidentiality and privacy of the criminal offender record information search response.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(B) The department shall retain a copy of each individual’s criminal offender record information search response until the date that the convictions that are the subject of the exception are no longer within the 10-year period specified in subdivision (b), and shall record the date the copy of the response was provided to the individual and the department.

(C) The criminal offender record information search response shall not be made available by the department to any individual other than the provider applicant.

(g) (1) Upon written notification that the department has determined that a request for exception shall be denied, the applicant may request an administrative hearing by submitting a written request to the department within 15 business days of receipt of the written notification. Upon receipt of a written request, the department shall hold an administrative hearing consistent with the procedures specified in Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, except where those procedures are inconsistent with this section.

(2) A hearing under this subdivision shall be conducted by a hearing officer or administrative law judge designated by the director. A written decision shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant.

(h) The department shall revise the provider enrollment form developed pursuant to Section 12305.81 to include both of the
 following:

(1) The text of subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code, and paragraph (2) of subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section 10980.

(2) A statement that the provider understands that if he or she has been convicted, or incarcerated following conviction for, any of the crimes specified in the provisions identified in paragraph (b) in the last 10 years, and has not received a certificate of rehabilitation or had the information or accusation dismissed, as provided in subdivision (c), he or she shall only be authorized to receive payment for providing in-home supportive services under an individual waiver or general exception as described in this section, and upon meeting all other applicable criteria for enrollment as a provider in the program.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing these provisions no later than July 1, 2011. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(2) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
 safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(j) In developing the individual waiver form and all-county letters or information notices or similar instructions, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of the county welfare departments, and representatives of consumers and providers. The consultation shall include at least one in-person meeting prior to the finalization of the individual waiver form and all-county letters or information
 notices or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 35.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.

(a) When enacted, 1991 Realignment Legislation implemented changes to the state and county cost-sharing ratios for services provided under this article. These provisions established the counties’ share of costs for the nonfederal portion of these services at 35 percent, with the state responsible for the remaining 65 percent of these costs. This cost-sharing ratio was the basis for determining the counties’ and the state’s share of costs for these services in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(b) Beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the state and counties shall share the annual cost of providing services under this article as specified in this section.

(c) The county share of cost of providing these services shall be the County IHSS Maintenance of Effort pursuant to Section 12306.16.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the state shall pay to each county, from the General Fund and any federal funds received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act available for that purpose, the difference between the actual total cost of providing services under this article that exceeds the county share as specified in subdivision (c).

(2) For services eligible for federal funding pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act under the Medi-Cal program, the state shall pay to each county, from the General Fund and any funds available for that purpose the difference between the actual nonfederal cost of providing services under this article that exceeds the county share as specified
 in subdivision (c).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 21.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.1.

(a) When any increase in provider wages or benefits is locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, or any increase in provider wages or benefits is adopted by ordinance pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, then the county shall use county-only funds to fund both the county share and the state share, including employment taxes, of any increase in the cost of the program, unless otherwise provided for in the annual Budget Act or appropriated by statute. No increase in wages or benefits locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance pursuant to this section, and no increase in the public authority administrative rate, shall take effect unless and until, prior to its implementation, the increase
 is reviewed and determined to be in compliance with state law and the department has obtained the approval of the State Department of Health Care Services for the increase pursuant to a determination that it is consistent with federal law and to ensure federal financial participation for the services under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and unless and until all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) Each county has provided the department with documentation of the approval of the county board of supervisors of the proposed public authority or nonprofit consortium rate, including wages and related expenditures. The documentation shall be received by the department before the department and the State Department of Health Care Services may approve the rate increase.

(2) Each county has met department guidelines and regulatory requirements as a condition of
 receiving state participation in the rate.

(b) Any rate approved pursuant to subdivision (a) shall take effect commencing on the first day of the month subsequent to the month in which final approval is received from the department. The department may grant approval on a conditional basis, subject to the availability of funding.

(c) The state shall pay 65 percent, and each county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of wage and benefit increases pursuant to subdivision (a) and associated employment taxes, only in accordance with subdivision (d).

(d) (1) The state shall participate in a total of wages and individual health benefits up to twelve dollars and ten cents ($12.10) per hour until the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code
 reaches twelve dollars ($12) per hour at which point the state shall participate as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) For any increase in wages or individual health benefits locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, and the rate increase is approved by the department, or any increase in provider wages or benefits adopted by ordinance pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the state shall participate as provided in subdivision (c) in a total of wages and individual health benefits up to one dollar and ten cents ($1.10) per hour above the amount per hour specified for the corresponding year in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, subdivision (c) of, and subdivision (d) of, Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.

(3) (A) For a county that is at or above
 twelve dollars and ten cents ($12.10) per hour in combined wages and individual health benefits, the state shall participate as provided in subdivision (c) in a cumulative total of up to 10 percent within a three-year period in the sum of the combined total of changes in wages or individual health benefits, or both.

(B) The state shall participate as provided in subparagraph (A) for no more than two three-year periods that commence prior to the date that the minimum wage reaches the amount specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, and no more than two three-year periods that commence on or after the date that the minimum wage reaches the amount specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, after which point the county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any future increases in wages and individual health benefits that exceed the amount specified in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(C) A three-year period is defined as three consecutive years. A new three-year
 period can only begin after the last year of the previous three-year period.

(4) Paragraphs (2) and (3) do not apply to contracts executed, or to increases in wages or individual health benefits, locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance, prior to July 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 56.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.16.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2017, all counties shall have a County IHSS Maintenance of Effort (MOE).

(b) (1) (A) The statewide total County IHSS MOE base for the 2017–18 fiscal year shall be established at one billion seven hundred sixty-nine million four hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($1,769,443,000). This amount reflects the estimated county share of IHSS program base costs calculated pursuant to Sections 10101.1 and 12306, as those sections read on June 1, 2017, and reflected in the department’s 2017 May Revision local assistance subvention table for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(B) If actual IHSS program base costs, as determined by the Department of
 Finance on or before May 14, 2018, attributable to the 2017–18 fiscal year are lower than the costs assumed in the 2017 May Revision local assistance subvention table, the statewide total County IHSS MOE base for the 2017–18 fiscal year shall be adjusted accordingly pursuant to Sections 10101.1 and 12306, as those sections read on June 1, 2017.

(2) The Department of Finance shall consult with the California State Association of Counties to determine each county’s share of the statewide total County IHSS MOE base amount. The County IHSS MOE base shall be unique to each individual county.

(3) (A) Administration expenditures are included in the County IHSS MOE and shall include both county administration, including costs associated with the IHSS case management, information, and payrolling system, and public authority administration.

(B) The amount of General Fund moneys available for county administration and public authority administration is limited to the amount of General Fund moneys appropriated for those specific purposes in the annual Budget Act, and increases to this amount do not impact the County IHSS MOE.

(C) To be eligible to receive its share of General Fund moneys appropriated in a fiscal year for county administration and public authority administration costs, the county is only required to expend the full amount of its County IHSS MOE that is attributable to county and public authority administration for that fiscal year and no additional county share of cost shall be required. The department shall consult with the California State Association of Counties to determine the county-by-county distribution of the amount of General Fund moneys appropriated in the annual Budget Act for county
 administration and public authority administration.

(D) Amounts expended by a county or public authority on administration in excess of the amount described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall not be attributed towards the county meeting its County IHSS MOE requirement.

(E) As part of the preparation of the 2018–19 Governor’s Budget, the department shall work with the California State Association of Counties, County Welfare Directors Association of California, and the Department of Finance to examine the workload and budget assumptions related to administration of the IHSS program for the 2017–18 and 2018–19 fiscal years.

(c) (1) On July 1, 2018, the County IHSS MOE base as specified in subdivision (b) shall be adjusted by an inflation factor of 5 percent.

(2) Beginning on July 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the County IHSS MOE from the previous year shall be adjusted by an inflation factor of 7 percent.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), in fiscal years in which the total of 1991 realignment revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the prior fiscal year is less than the total received for the next prior fiscal year, the inflation factor shall be zero.

(B) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), in fiscal years in which the total of 1991 realignment revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the prior fiscal year is equal to or up to 2 percent greater than the total received for the next prior fiscal year, the inflation factor shall
 be one-half of the amount specified in either paragraph (1) or (2).

(C) The Department of Finance shall provide notification to the appropriate fiscal committees of the Legislature and the California State Association of Counties by May 14 of each year of the inflation factor that will apply for the following fiscal year, based on the calculation in subparagraph (A) and (B).

(d) In addition to the adjustment in subdivision (c), the County IHSS MOE shall be adjusted for the annualized cost of increases in provider wages or health benefits that are locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed, on or after July 1, 2017, including any increases in provider wages or health benefits adopted by ordinance pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(1) (A) If the department approves an increase in provider wages or health benefits that are locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance pursuant to Section 12306.1, the state shall pay 65 percent, and the affected county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of the cost increase in accordance with subparagraph (B).

(B) With respect to any increase in provider wages or health benefits approved on or after July 1, 2017, pursuant to subparagraph (A), the state shall participate in that increase as provided in subparagraph (A) up to the amount specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 12306.1. The county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any cost increase exceeding the amount specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 12306.1.

(C) With respect to an increase in benefits, other than
 individual health benefits, locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, or adopted by ordinance, the county’s County IHSS MOE shall include a one-time adjustment equal to 35 percent of the nonfederal share of the increased benefit costs.

(D) The county share of increased expenditures pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, shall be included in the County IHSS MOE, in addition to the amount established under subdivisions (b) and (c). For any increase in provider wages or health benefits, or increase in other benefits pursuant to subparagraph (C), that becomes effective on a date other than July 1, the Department of Finance shall adjust the county’s County IHSS MOE to reflect the annualized cost of the county’s share of the nonfederal cost of the wage or health benefit increase. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s 2017–18 paid IHSS hours and the appropriate
 cost-sharing ratio as grown by the applicable number of inflation factors pursuant to subdivision (c) that have occurred up to and including the fiscal year in which the increase becomes effective.

(2) (A) If the department does not approve the increase in provider wages or health benefits, or increase in other benefits pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), that are locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance pursuant to Section 12306.1 or paragraph (3), the county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of the cost increases.

(B) The county share of increased expenditures pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be included in the County IHSS MOE, in addition to the amount established under subdivisions (b) and (c). For any increase in provider wages or health benefits that becomes effective on a date other than July 1, the Department of
 Finance shall adjust the county’s County IHSS MOE to reflect the annualized cost of the county’s share of the nonfederal cost of the wage or health benefit increase. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s 2017–18 paid IHSS hours and the appropriate county sharing ratio as grown by the appropriate number of applicable inflation factors pursuant to subdivision (c) that have occurred up to and including the fiscal year in which the increase becomes effective.

(3) In addition to the rate approval requirements specified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 12306.1, it shall be presumed by the department that rates and other economic terms that are locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance are approved.

(4) (A) With respect to any rate increases to existing contracts that a county has already entered into
 pursuant to Section 12302, the state shall pay 65 percent, and the affected county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of the amount of the rate increase up to the maximum amounts established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. The county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any portion of the rate increase exceeding the maximum amount established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s 2017–18 paid IHSS contract hours, or the paid contract hours in the fiscal year in which the contract becomes effective if the contract becomes effective on or after July 1, 2017, using the appropriate cost-sharing ratio as grown by the applicable number of inflation factors pursuant to subdivision (c) that have occurred up to and including the fiscal year in which the increase becomes effective.

(B) With respect to rates for new contracts entered into by a county pursuant to Section
 12302 on or after July 1, 2017, the state shall pay 65 percent, and the affected county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of the difference between the locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance, provider wage and the contract rate for all of the hours of service to IHSS recipients to be provided under the contract up to the maximum amounts established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. The county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any portion of the contract rate exceeding the maximum amount established pursuant to Sections 12302.1 and 12303. This adjustment shall be calculated based on the county’s paid contract hours in the fiscal year in which the contract becomes effective using the appropriate cost-sharing ratio.

(C) The county share of these expenditures shall be included in the County IHSS MOE, in addition to the amounts established under subdivisions (b) and (c). For any rate increases for
 existing contracts or rates for new contracts, entered into by a county pursuant to Section 12302 on or after July 1, 2017, that become effective on a date other than July 1, the Department of Finance shall adjust the county’s County IHSS MOE to reflect the annualized cost of the county’s share of the nonfederal cost of the increase or rate for new contracts. This adjustment shall be calculated as follows:

(i) For a contract described in subparagraph (A), the first-year cost of the amount of the rate increase calculated using the pro rata share of the number of hours of service provided in the contract for the fiscal year in which the increase became effective.

(ii) For a contract described in subparagraph (B), the first-year cost of the difference between the locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance, provider wage and the contract rate for all of the hours
 of service to IHSS recipients calculated using the pro rata share of the number of hours of service provided in the contract for the fiscal year in which the contract became effective.

(5) In the event the state ceases to receive enhanced federal financial participation for the provision of services pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)), the County IHSS MOE shall be adjusted one time to reflect a 35-percent share of the enhanced federal financial participation that would have been received pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)) for the fiscal year in which the state ceases to receive the enhanced federal financial participation.

(6) The County IHSS MOE shall not be adjusted for increases in individual provider wages that are locally negotiated pursuant to subdivision (a) of, and
 paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of, Section 12306.1 when the increase has been specifically negotiated to take effect at the same time as, and to be the same amount as, state minimum wage increases.

(7) (A) A county may negotiate a wage supplement.

(i) The wage supplement shall be in addition to the highest wage rate paid in the county since June 30, 2017.

(ii) The first time the wage supplement is applied, the county’s County IHSS MOE shall include a one-time adjustment by the amount of the increased cost resulting from the supplement, as specified in paragraph (1).

(B) A wage supplement negotiated pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall subsequently be applied to the minimum wage when the minimum wage increase is equal to or
 exceeds the county wage paid without inclusion of the wage supplement and the increase to the county wage paid takes effect at the same time as the minimum wage increase.

(C) For any changes to provider wages or health benefits locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, for which a rate change request was submitted to the department prior to January 1, 2018, for review, clause (i) of subparagraph (A) and subparagraph (B) shall not apply. A wage supplement subject to this subparagraph shall subsequently be applied to the minimum wage when the minimum wage is equal to or exceeds the county individual provider wage including the wage supplement.

(8) The Department of Finance shall consult with the California State Association of Counties to develop the computations for the annualized amounts pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) The County IHSS MOE shall only be adjusted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(f) A county’s County IHSS MOE costs paid to the state shall be reduced by the amount of any General Fund offset provided to the county pursuant to Section 12306.17.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 78.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section inoperative as of July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.   See later operative version amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.16.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2019, all counties shall have a rebased County IHSS Maintenance of Effort (MOE).

(b) (1) The statewide total rebased County IHSS MOE base for the 2019–20 fiscal year shall be established at one billion five hundred sixty-three million two hundred eighty-two thousand dollars ($1,563,282,000).

(2) The Department of Finance shall consult with the department and the California State Association of Counties to determine each county’s share of the statewide total rebased County IHSS MOE base amount. The rebased County IHSS MOE base shall be unique to each individual county.

(3) (A) The amount of General Fund moneys available for county administration and public authority administration is limited to the amount of General Fund moneys appropriated for those specific purposes in the annual Budget Act, and increases to this amount do not impact the rebased County IHSS MOE.

(B) The state shall pay 100 percent of the allowable nonfederal share of county administration and public authority administration costs for each county. Once the county’s share of the appropriated General Fund moneys is exhausted, the county shall pay 100 percent of the remaining nonfederal share of county administration and public authority administration costs. Each county shall pay 100 percent of any costs for public authority administration that are in excess of the county’s approved rate approved pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12306.1. At the end of the fiscal year, any remaining unspent General Fund moneys allocated for IHSS
 county administration or public authority administration shall be redistributed through a methodology determined in conjunction with the County Welfare Directors Association of California or the California Association of Public Authorities.

(C) Amounts expended by a county or public authority on administration in excess of the amount described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall not be attributed towards the county meeting its rebased County IHSS MOE requirement.

(D) The department shall consult with the California State Association of Counties, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and the California Association of Public Authorities to determine the county-by-county distribution of the amount of General Fund moneys appropriated in the annual Budget Act for county administration and public authority administration.

(c) Beginning on July 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the rebased County IHSS MOE from the previous year shall be adjusted by an inflation factor of 4 percent.
